en: Letter Openers
xx: Letter Openers
cs: Otvírače na dopisy
da: Brevåbnere
de: Brieföffner
es: Abridores de cartas
fr: Coupe-papier
it: Aprilettere
ja: レターオープナー・ペーパーナイフ
nl: Briefopeners
no: Brevåpnere
pl: Noże do papieru
pt: Abridores de carta
ru: Канцелярские ножи
sv: Brevöppnare
tr: Mektup Açacakları

en: Magnifiers
xx: Magnifiers
cs: Lupy
da: Forstørrelsesglas
de: Lupen
es: Lupas
fr: Loupes
it: Lenti di ingrandimento
ja: 虫眼鏡・ルーペ
nl: Vergrootglazen
no: Forstørrelsesglass
pl: Szkła powiększające
pt: Lupas
ru: Увеличительные стекла
sv: Förstoringsglas
tr: Büyüteçler

en: Office Rubber Stamps
xx: Office Rubber Stamps
cs: Kancelářská razítka
da: Kontorgummistempler
de: Bürostempel
es: Sellos de caucho para oficina
fr: Tampons professionnels
it: Timbri in gomma per ufficio
ja: 事務用ゴム印
nl: Kantoorstempels
no: Kontorstempler
pl: Pieczątki biurowe
pt: Carimbos de borracha para escritório
ru: Офисные резиновые штампы
sv: Gummistämplar för kontorsbruk
tr: Ofis Lastik Damgaları

en: Pencil Sharpeners
xx: Pencil Sharpeners
cs: Ořezávátka
da: Blyantspidsere
de: Bleistiftspitzer
es: Sacapuntas
fr: Taille-crayons
it: Temperamatite
ja: 鉛筆削り
nl: Puntenslijpers
no: Blyantspissere
pl: Temperówki
pt: Apontadores
ru: Точилки для карандашей
sv: Pennvässare
tr: Kalemtıraşlar

en: Staple Removers
xx: Staple Removers
cs: Odstraňovače sešití
da: Hæfteklammefjernere
de: Heftklammernzieher
es: Quitagrapas
fr: Dégrafeuses
it: Pinze rimuovigraffette
ja: ホッチキス針リムーバー
nl: Nietjesverwijderaar
no: Stiftefjernere
pl: Rozszywacze
pt: Removedores de grampos
ru: Антистеплеры
sv: Klammerborttagare
tr: Zımba Teli Sökücüler

en: Staplers
xx: Staplers
cs: Sešívačky
da: Hæftemaskiner
de: Heftgeräte
es: Grapadoras
fr: Agrafeuses
it: Graffettatrici
ja: ホッチキス
nl: Nietapparaten
no: Stiftemaskiner
pl: Zszywacze
pt: Grampeadores
ru: Степлеры
sv: Häftapparater
tr: Zımbalar

en: Tape Dispensers
xx: Tape Dispensers
cs: Dávkovače pásky
da: Tapedispensere
de: Klebebandabroller
es: Dispensadores de celofán
fr: Dérouleurs de ruban adhésif
it: Dispenser per nastro adesivo
ja: テープカッター
nl: Plakbandhouders
no: Tapeholdere
pl: Podajniki na taśmę klejącą
pt: Suporte para fita adesiva
ru: Диспенсеры для клейкой ленты
sv: Tejphållare
tr: Bant Kesiciler

en: Writing & Drawing Instrument Accessories
xx: Writing & Drawing Instrument Accessories
cs: Psací potřeby – příslušenství
da: Skrive- og tegneredskaber – tilbehør
de: Schreibwerkzeugzubehör
es: Accesorios para escritura y dibujo
fr: Accessoires pour instruments d'écriture
it: Accessori strumenti per scrivere
ja: 筆記具用インク・替芯
nl: Accessoires voor schrijfinstrumenten
no: Tilbehør til skrive- og tegneutstyr
pl: Akcesoria do przyborów piśmienniczych i rysunkowych
pt: Acessórios para instrumentos de escrita
ru: Аксессуары для письменных принадлежностей
sv: Tillbehör till skriv- och ritinstrument
tr: Yazım ve Çizim Aleti Aksesuarları

en: Marker & Highlighter Ink Refills
xx: Marker & Highlighter Ink Refills
cs: Náhradní náplně do fixů a zvýrazňovačů
da: Markeringspenne og highlightere – genpåfyldningsblæk
de: Marker-Nachfülltinte
es: Recargas para rotuladores y marcadores
fr: Recharges d'encre pour marqueurs et surligneurs
it: Ricariche d'inchiostro per evidenziatori e pennarelli
ja: 蛍光ペン用詰替インク
nl: Inktpatronen voor markeerstiften en highlighters
no: Påfyll til markørtusjer og merkepenner
pl: Tusze do markerów i zakreślaczy
pt: Refis de tinta para marcadores
ru: Чернила для заправки маркеров
sv: Påfyllning till märkpennor och överstrykningspennor
tr: Markör ve Vurgulayıcı Mürekkep Refilleri

en: Highlighter Refills
xx: Highlighter Refills
cs: Náplně do zvýrazňovačů
da: Genpåfyldning til highlightere
de: Nachfülltinte für Textmarker
es: Recargas para subrayadores
fr: Recharges pour surligneurs
it: Ricariche per evidenziatori
ja: 蛍光ペンのリフィル（詰め替え）
nl: Navulling voor arceerstiften
no: Refill til markeringspenner
pl: Wkłady do zakreślaczy
pt: Refil para marca texto
ru: Чернила для текстовыделителей
sv: Refill för överstrykningspennor
tr: Fosforlu Kalem Mürekkepleri

en: Marker Refills
xx: Marker Refills
cs: Náplně do popisovačů
da: Genpåfyldning til filtpenne
de: Nachfülltinte für Markierstifte
es: Recargas para rotuladores
fr: Recharges pour marqueurs
it: Ricariche per pennarelli
ja: サインペン・マーカーのリフィル（詰め替え）
nl: Navulling voor markers
no: Refill til merkepenner
pl: Wkłady do markerów
pt: Refil para marcador
ru: Чернила для маркеров
sv: Refill för märkpennor
tr: Keçeli Kalem Mürekkepleri

en: Pen Ink & Refills
xx: Pen Ink & Refills
cs: Inkousty a náplně do per
da: Kuglepen – blæk og genopfyldning
de: Füllertinte & -patronen
es: Recambios y tintas
fr: Encre et cartouches pour stylos
it: Inchiostro penna e ricariche
ja: ペン用詰替インク
nl: Inkt- en navulpatronen voor pennen
no: Penneblekk og påfyll
pl: Atramenty i naboje
pt: Tinta e refil para canetas
ru: Чернила и стержни для ручек
sv: Bläck och patroner till bläckpennor
tr: Kalem Mürekkep ve Refilleri

en: Pencil Lead & Refills
xx: Pencil Lead & Refills
cs: Tuhy a náplně do tužek
da: Blyant – bly og genopfyldning
de: Bleistiftminen
es: Recambios para portaminas
fr: Mines et recharges pour crayons
it: Portamine e mine
ja: シャープペンシル替芯
nl: Lood- en navulpatronen voor vulpotloden
no: Blyantbly og påfyll
pl: Wkłady do ołówków automatycznych
pt: Grafite e refil para lapiseiras
ru: Карандашные грифели
sv: Blyertsstift
tr: Kalem Kurşun ve Refilleri

en: Writing & Drawing Instruments
xx: Writing & Drawing Instruments
cs: Psací potřeby
da: Skrive- og tegneredskaber
de: Schreibgeräte
es: Artículos de escritura y dibujo
fr: Instruments d'écriture et de dessin
it: Strumenti per scrivere e disegnare
ja: 筆記用具
nl: Schrijfinstrumenten
no: Skrive- og tegneutstyr
pl: Przybory piśmiennicze i rysunkowe
pt: Instrumentos de escrita
ru: Инструменты для письма и рисования
sv: Skriv- och ritinstrument
tr: Yazım ve Çizim Aletleri

en: Art Charcoals
xx: Art Charcoals
cs: Malířský uhel
da: Kulstifter
de: Zeichenkohle
es: Carboncillos
fr: Fusains
it: Carboncino
ja: 画用木炭
nl: Houtskool
no: Tegnekull
pl: Węgiel rysunkowy
pt: Carvões artísticos
ru: Уголь для рисования
sv: Ritkol
tr: Karakalemler

en: Chalk
xx: Chalk
cs: Psací křída
da: Kridt
de: Tafelkreide
es: Tiza
fr: Craies
it: Gesso per scrivere
ja: チョーク
nl: Schoolbordkrijt
no: Kritt
pl: Kreda
pt: Giz de escrita
ru: Мел
sv: Kritor
tr: Tebeşir

en: Crayons
xx: Crayons
cs: Krajóny
da: Tegnekridt
de: Wachsmalstifte
es: Ceras
fr: Crayons cire
it: Pastelli colorati
ja: クレヨン
nl: Kleurkrijtjes
no: Fargestifter
pl: Kredki
pt: Giz de cera
ru: Цветные мелки
sv: Färgkritor
tr: Boya Kalemleri

en: Markers & Highlighters
xx: Markers & Highlighters
cs: Popisovače a zvýrazňovače
da: Markeringspenne og highlightere
de: Markierstifte & Textmarker
es: Rotuladores y marcadores
fr: Marqueurs et surligneurs
it: Pennarelli ed evidenziatori
ja: マーカーペン・蛍光ペン
nl: Markeerstiften
no: Markørtusjer og merkepenner
pl: Markery i zakreślacze
pt: Marcadores
ru: Маркеры и выделители
sv: Märkpennor och överstrykningspennor
tr: Markörler ve Vurgulayıcılar

en: Highlighters
xx: Highlighters
cs: Zvýrazňovače
da: Highlightere
de: Textmarker
es: Subrayadores
fr: Surligneurs
it: Evidenziatori
ja: 蛍光ペン
nl: Arceerstiften
no: Markeringstusjer
pl: Zakreślacze
pt: Marca texto
ru: Текстовыделители
sv: Överstrykningspennor
tr: Fosforlu Kalemler

en: Markers
xx: Markers
cs: Popisovače
da: Filtpen
de: Markierstifte
es: Rotuladores
fr: Marqueurs
it: Pennarelli
ja: サインペン・マーカー
nl: Markers
no: Merkepenner
pl: Markery
pt: Marcador
ru: Маркеры
sv: Märkpennor
tr: Keçeli Kalemler